Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-426.01
Race utilizing floating objects; requirements.

(1) Pursuant to a special permit obtained in accordance with section 9-426, a licensed organization may conduct a lottery or raffle in which the winners are to be determined by a race utilizing inanimate, buoyant objects floated along a river, canal, or other waterway. The objects shall each bear a number or other unique identifying mark which corresponds to sequentially numbered tickets which are sold to participants in the lottery or raffle. A licensed organization utilizing this method of winner determination shall comply with all other requirements of the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

(2) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of a lottery or raffle utilizing the method of winner determination provided by this section.

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 24.